Hawaii statutes.
§328-99 Exceptions. Out-of-state
prescriptions filled pursuant to section 328-17.6 shall be exempt from this
part. [L 1980, c 187, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 283, §22; am L 1992, c 177, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next